Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-551
Railways; depots; regulation.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to regulate levees, depots, depot grounds, and places for storing freight and goods and to provide for and regulate the passage of railways through streets and public grounds of the city or village.

Laws 1879, § 69, XX, p. 215;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XX, p. 182;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XX, p. 173;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XX, p. 302;

R.S.1913, § 5125;

C.S.1922, § 4300;

C.S.1929, § 17-449;

R.S.1943, § 17-551;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 176.